Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.110

Publication of list of licensees and rules—Posting license.

The director may publish a list, as often as he or she deems necessary, of all persons licensed under this chapter together with all the necessary rules and regulations concerning the enforcement of this chapter. Each person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall post his or her license or a copy thereof in his or her place or places of business in plain view of the public.

[ 2011 c 336 s 572; 1959 c 139 s 11.]